Massachusetts, session 194th, S191.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 182A of chapter 140 of the General Laws, as most recently inserted
by section 248 of chapter 238 of the acts of 2024, is hereby amended by striking out subsection
(b) and inserting in place thereof the following:-
(b) (1) No person, firm, corporation or other entity shall employ a paperless ticketing
system unless the consumer is given an option at the time of initial sale to purchase the same
paperless tickets in transferable form that the consumer can transfer at any price, and at any time,
and without additional fees.
(2) The established price for any given ticket shall be the same regardless of the form or
transferability of such ticket.
of 3

(3) The ability for a ticket to be transferred shall not constitute a special service for the
purpose of imposing a service charge subject to section 185D. It shall be unlawful to penalize,
discriminate against or deny access to a ticket buyer on the basis that the ticket was transferred or
resold, including if the ticket was transferred or resold independent from the initial sale ticketing
system.
(4) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, an operator of any such theatrical
exhibition, public show or public amusement or exhibition, or such operator’s agent, may offer
paperless tickets that do not allow for transferability; provided, that: (i) those tickets shall be sold
or given to individuals or groups as part of a private event or a targeted promotion at a
discounted price offered because of the individual’s or group’s status or affiliation with religious
or charitable institutions, societies or organizations or civic leagues or organizations not
organized for profit but operated exclusively for the promotion of social welfare, associations of
veterans of any wars of the United States, students, or groups or individuals characterized by a
disability or economic hardship and tickets issued through a non-transferable ticketing system
pursuant to the exemption in this subsection shall not be offered promotionally to the general
public and shall be clearly marked as a ticket restricted to the specified individual or group; or
(ii) such tickets shall be included in a membership pass at a discounted price offered by a
professional sports organization for seating in venues or stadiums with a fixed capacity of not
less than 19,000 seats that guarantees entry to a specified number of events in a specified time
period with seat assignments: (A) assigned not more than 4 hours prior to the commencement of
the event; and (B) variable from game to game and not intended for season ticket holders.
Tickets provided under a membership pass may be restricted from being transferred or resold,
including through the operator or operator’s agents, and shall be clearly marked as such prior to
of 3

initial offering or sale. Such membership pass shall not mean a subscription or season ticket
package offered for sale and shall not result in the sale of more than 5 per cent of the maximum
amount of all seats that will be made available at a venue for a particular event to be sold under
this subsection
SECTION 2. Subsection (c) of section 182A of chapter 140 of the General Laws, as most
recently inserted by section 248 of chapter 238 of the Acts of 2024, is hereby amended by
striking the first sentence.
SECTION 3. Subsection (a) of section 185A of chapter 140 of the General Laws, as most
recently inserted by section 249 of chapter 238 of the acts of 2024, is hereby amended by
inserting at the end thereof the following:- provided, however that any primary ticket issuer and
any operator or manager of a website or other platform to facilitate resale, or resale through a
competitive bidding process, solely between third parties and that does not in any other manner
engage in reselling of tickets shall be exempt from said licensing requirements.
SECTION 4. Subsection (c) of section 185D of chapter 140 of the General Laws, as most
recently inserted by section 249 of chapter 238 of the acts of 2024, shall take effect beginning
July 1, 2025.
of 3